Hawaii statutes.
[§159-32] Reimbursement for inspection. The
department may perform inspection of meat and meat products derived from exotic
animals when requested by persons desiring such inspection. Persons requesting
and receiving inspection service under this part shall reimburse the State for
all costs incurred by the State in the provision of the service. All such
reimbursements shall be deposited into the general fund. [L 1990, c 139, pt of
§1; am L 1991, c 88, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next